Maryland, session 2026, HB0008.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
3–1701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Emergency” means a catastrophic health emergency, as defined under §
14–3A–01 of the Public Safety Article, that is the subject of an executive proclamation
under § 14–3A–02 of the Public Safety Article and is related to a communicable disease.
(c) (1) “Essential employer” means a person that employs an essential worker.
(2) “Essential employer” includes a unit of State or local government.
(d) “Essential worker” means an individual who:
(1) performs a duty or work responsibility during an emergency that
cannot be performed remotely or is required to be completed at the work site; and
(2) provides services that the essential employer determines to be essential
or critical to its operations.
Article – Transportation
21–202.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(5) “Traffic control signal monitoring system” means a device with one or
more motor vehicle sensors working in conjunction with a traffic control signal to produce
recorded images of motor vehicles entering an intersection against a red signal indication.
21–704.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(3) “Automated railroad grade crossing enforcement system” means a
system operated by an agency that records a driver’s response to a traffic control signal or
traffic control device located at a railroad grade crossing.
21–706.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.

HOUSE BILL 8 3
(5) “School bus monitoring camera” means a camera placed on a school bus
that is designed to capture a recorded image of a driver of a motor vehicle committing a
violation.
21–707.1.
(b) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(5) “Stop sign monitoring system” means a device designed to capture a
recorded image of a violation.
21–809.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(9) “Speed monitoring system” means a device with one or more motor
vehicle sensors producing recorded images of motor vehicles traveling at speeds at least 12
miles per hour above the posted speed limit.
21–810.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(7) “Work zone speed control system” means a device that:
(i) Has one or more motor vehicle sensors connected to a camera
system capable of producing recorded images of motor vehicles traveling at or above a
predetermined speed in or approaching a work zone; and
(ii) Is equipped with flashing blue lights.
SUBTITLE 8A. DANGEROUS DRIVER ABATEMENT PROGRAM.
21–8A–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “AUTOMATED RAILROAD GRADE CROSSING ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM”
HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 21–704.1 OF THIS TITLE.
(C) “ESSENTIAL WORKER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–1701 OF THE
LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 8
(D) “LOW–INCOME REPEAT OFFENDER” MEANS A REPEAT OFFENDER WITH
AN ANNUAL HOUSEHOLD INCOME THAT IS AT OR BELOW 200% OF THE FEDERAL
POVERTY LEVEL.
(E) (1) “OWNER” MEANS:
(I) THE REGISTERED OWNER OF A MOTOR VEHICLE;
(II) A LESSEE OF A MOTOR VEHICLE UNDER A LEASE OF 6
MONTHS OR MORE; OR
(III) A PERSON WHO RENTS AND OPERATES A RENTAL MOTOR
VEHICLE.
(2) “OWNER” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A MOTOR VEHICLE RENTAL OR LEASING COMPANY; OR
(II) A HOLDER OF A SPECIAL REGISTRATION PLATE ISSUED
UNDER TITLE 13, SUBTITLE 9, PART III OF THIS ARTICLE.
(F) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE DANGEROUS DRIVER ABATEMENT PROGRAM.
(G) “QR CODE” MEANS A MACHINE–READABLE CODE, CONSISTING OF AN
ARRAY OF SQUARES, USED FOR STORING AN INTERNET WEBSITE IN ORDER TO
ACCESS A WEBPAGE.
(H) “REPEAT OFFENDER” MEANS AN OWNER OF A MOTOR VEHICLE THAT,
WITHIN A 12–MONTH PERIOD, IS RECORDED BY:
(1) A TRAFFIC CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM WHILE
OPERATING THE MOTOR VEHICLE IN VIOLATION OF § 21–202.1 OF THIS TITLE THREE
OR MORE TIMES;
(2) AN AUTOMATED RAILROAD GRADE CROSSING ENFORCEMENT
SYSTEM WHILE OPERATING THE MOTOR VEHICLE IN VIOLATION OF § 21–704.1 OF
THIS TITLE THREE OR MORE TIMES;
(3) A SCHOOL BUS MONITORING CAMERA WHILE OPERATING THE
MOTOR VEHICLE IN VIOLATION OF § 21–706.1 OF THIS TITLE THREE OR MORE TIMES;

HOUSE BILL 8 5
(4) A STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEM WHILE OPERATING THE
MOTOR VEHICLE IN VIOLATION OF § 21–707.1 OF THIS TITLE THREE OR MORE TIMES;
OR
(5) A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OR WORK ZONE SPEED CONTROL
SYSTEM WHILE BEING OPERATED IN VIOLATION OF SUBTITLE 8 OF THIS TITLE FIVE
OR MORE TIMES.
(I) “SCHOOL BUS MONITORING CAMERA” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
21–706.1 OF THIS TITLE.
(J) “SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 21–809
OF THIS TITLE.
(K) “STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
21–707.1 OF THIS TITLE.
(L) “TRAFFIC CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 21–202.1 OF THIS TITLE.
(M) “WORK ZONE SPEED CONTROL SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
21–810 OF THIS TITLE.
21–8A–02.
(A) THERE IS A DANGEROUS DRIVER ABATEMENT PROGRAM.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO REDUCE MOTOR
VEHICLE–RELATED DEATHS BY REQUIRING REPEAT OFFENDERS TO COMPLETE AN
ADMINISTRATION–APPROVED DRIVER ACCOUNTABILITY AND SAFETY COURSE OR
BE SUBJECT TO SANCTIONS.
(C) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
21–8A–03.
THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE BY MAIL AND, WHEN
POSSIBLE, ELECTRONICALLY TO EACH REPEAT OFFENDER OF:
(1) THE NUMBER AND TYPE OF EACH VIOLATION RECORDED BY A
TRAFFIC CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM, AN AUTOMATED RAILROAD
GRADE CROSSING ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM, A SCHOOL BUS MONITORING CAMERA, A

HOUSE BILL 8
STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEM, A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM, OR A WORK ZONE
SPEED CONTROL SYSTEM FOR WHICH THE REPEAT OFFENDER IS LIABLE;
(2) THE LOCATION OF EACH VIOLATION;
(3) THE LOCATION OF EACH SYSTEM OR CAMERA THAT RECORDED
EACH VIOLATION;
(4) THE DATE AND TIME OF THE VIOLATIONS;
(5) THE REQUIREMENT TO COMPLETE AN
ADMINISTRATION–APPROVED DRIVER ACCOUNTABILITY AND SAFETY COURSE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 21–8A–04 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(6) THE ADMINISTRATION–APPROVED DRIVER ACCOUNTABILITY
AND SAFETY COURSES AVAILABLE, INCLUDING:
(I) A LINK AND QR CODE FOR THE LIST OF
ADMINISTRATION–APPROVED DRIVER ACCOUNTABILITY AND SAFETY COURSES
POSTED ON THE ADMINISTRATION’S WEBSITE;
(II) THE LANGUAGE IN WHICH EACH COURSE IS PROVIDED;
(III) WHETHER A COURSE IS IN–PERSON OR VIRTUAL;
(IV) THE COST OF EACH COURSE; AND
(V) THE DATES OF EACH COURSE; AND
(7) THE CONSEQUENCES OF FAILING TO COMPLY WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
21–8A–04.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, EACH REPEAT
OFFENDER SHALL SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETE AN ADMINISTRATION–APPROVED
DRIVER ACCOUNTABILITY AND SAFETY COURSE WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING
NOTICE UNDER § 21–8A–03 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) (I) THE DRIVER ACCOUNTABILITY AND SAFETY COURSE
PROVIDER SHALL SUBMIT TO THE ADMINISTRATION PROOF OF A REPEAT
OFFENDER’S SUCCESSFUL COMPLETION OF THE COURSE, INCLUDING THE REPEAT

HOUSE BILL 8 7
OFFENDER’S DRIVER’S LICENSE NUMBER OR OTHER ADMINISTRATION IDENTIFIER,
WITHIN 48 HOURS AFTER SUCCESSFUL COMPLETION OF THE COURSE.
(II) A REPEAT OFFENDER MAY:
1. UPLOAD ON THE ADMINISTRATION’S WEBSITE PROOF
OF SUCCESSFUL COMPLETION OF A DRIVER ACCOUNTABILITY AND SAFETY COURSE;
OR
2. PROVIDE PROOF OF SUCCESSFUL COMPLETION OF A
DRIVER ACCOUNTABILITY AND SAFETY COURSE IN PERSON AT AN ADMINISTRATION
OFFICE.
(B) (1) IF A REPEAT OFFENDER FAILS TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF
SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL SUSPEND THE
RENEWAL OF THE REPEAT OFFENDER’S MOTOR VEHICLE REGISTRATION UNTIL THE
REPEAT OFFENDER SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETES AN ADMINISTRATION–APPROVED
DRIVER ACCOUNTABILITY AND SAFETY COURSE.
(2) IF A REPEAT OFFENDER DOES NOT SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETE AN
ADMINISTRATION–APPROVED DRIVER ACCOUNTABILITY AND SAFETY COURSE
WITHIN 180 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING NOTICE UNDER § 21–8A–03 OF THIS SUBTITLE,
THE ADMINISTRATION MAY IMPOUND OR IMMOBILIZE THE REPEAT OFFENDER’S
MOTOR VEHICLE UNTIL THE REPEAT OFFENDER SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETES AN
ADMINISTRATION–APPROVED DRIVER ACCOUNTABILITY AND SAFETY COURSE.
(3) A SUSPENSION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL BE LIFTED AUTOMATICALLY ON RECEIPT OF PROOF OF SUCCESSFUL COURSE
COMPLETION IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) (1) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY GRANT A WAIVER FROM THE
REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION FOR A PERSON WHO
PROVIDES EVIDENCE THAT:
(I) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
MOTOR VEHICLE OR THE REGISTRATION PLATES OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE WERE
STOLEN BEFORE A VIOLATION OCCURRED AND WERE NOT UNDER THE CONTROL OR
POSSESSION OF THE PERSON AT THE TIME OF A VIOLATION;
(II) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
PERSON WAS NOT OPERATING THE MOTOR VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF A VIOLATION;
OR

HOUSE BILL 8
(III) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
PERSON WAS NOT THE OWNER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF A
VIOLATION.
(2) TO DEMONSTRATE THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE OR THE
REGISTRATION PLATES WERE STOLEN BEFORE A VIOLATION OCCURRED AND WERE
NOT UNDER THE CONTROL OR POSSESSION OF THE PERSON ALLEGED TO HAVE BEEN
OPERATING THE MOTOR VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF A VIOLATION, THE PERSON SHALL
SUBMIT PROOF THAT A POLICE REPORT REGARDING THE STOLEN MOTOR VEHICLE
OR REGISTRATION PLATES WAS FILED IN A TIMELY MANNER.
(3) TO DEMONSTRATE THAT THE PERSON ALLEGED TO HAVE BEEN
DRIVING THE MOTOR VEHICLE WAS NOT OPERATING THE MOTOR VEHICLE AT THE
TIME OF A VIOLATION, THE PERSON SHALL PROVIDE TO THE ADMINISTRATION A
LETTER, SWORN TO OR AFFIRMED BY THE PERSON AND MAILED BY CERTIFIED MAIL,
RETURN RECEIPT REQUESTED, THAT:
(I) STATES THAT THE PERSON WAS NOT OPERATING THE
MOTOR VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION; AND
(II) INCLUDES ANY OTHER CORROBORATING EVIDENCE.
(4) TO DEMONSTRATE THAT THE PERSON ALLEGED TO HAVE BEEN
DRIVING THE MOTOR VEHICLE WAS NOT THE OWNER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE AT
THE TIME OF A VIOLATION, THE PERSON SHALL PROVIDE TO THE ADMINISTRATION:
(I) A COPY OF THE TRANSFERRED TITLE OR BILL OF SALE; AND
(II) PROOF THAT THE REGISTRATION PLATES WERE
SURRENDERED OR THAT THE SECURITY REQUIRED UNDER TITLE 17, SUBTITLE 1 OF
THIS ARTICLE WAS CANCELED.
(D) (1) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL DEVELOP AND POST ON THE
ADMINISTRATION’S WEBSITE A LIST OF ADMINISTRATION–APPROVED DRIVER
ACCOUNTABILITY AND SAFETY COURSES.
(2) THE LIST OF ADMINISTRATION–APPROVED DRIVER
ACCOUNTABILITY AND SAFETY COURSES SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE LANGUAGE IN WHICH EACH COURSE IS PROVIDED;
(II) WHETHER A COURSE IS IN–PERSON OR VIRTUAL;

HOUSE BILL 8 9
(III) THE COST OF EACH COURSE; AND
(IV) THE DATES OF EACH COURSE.
(E) (1) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL PROVIDE AN OPTION FOR
UPLOADING ON THE ADMINISTRATION’S WEBSITE PROOF OF SUCCESSFUL
COMPLETION OF A DRIVER ACCOUNTABILITY AND SAFETY COURSE.
(2) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS SPECIFYING
THE FILE FORMAT FOR UPLOADING MATERIALS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
21–8A–05.
(A) A LOW–INCOME REPEAT OFFENDER MAY APPLY FOR:
(1) A WAIVER OR REDUCTION IN ANY APPLICABLE DRIVER
ACCOUNTABILITY AND SAFETY COURSE FEES;
(2) A FLEXIBLE PAYMENT PLAN FOR ANY APPLICABLE FINES; AND
(3) ACCESS TO ONLINE OR COMMUNITY–BASED
ADMINISTRATION–APPROVED DRIVER ACCOUNTABILITY AND SAFETY COURSES.
(B) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ESTABLISH A HARDSHIP APPEAL
PROCESS FOR:
(1) ESSENTIAL WORKERS; AND
(2) INDIVIDUALS FROM HOUSEHOLDS WITH NO VIABLE TRANSIT
ALTERNATIVES TO A MOTOR VEHICLE.
21–8A–06.
ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 31 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2028, THE
ADMINISTRATION SHALL PUBLISH ON ITS WEBSITE AND REPORT TO THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE,
THE NUMBER OF PARTICIPANTS IN THE PROGRAM IN THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING YEAR, DISAGGREGATED BY RACE, INCOME, AND GEOGRAPHY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.